California statutes. Business and Professions Code
The board may adopt regulations that prohibit the entry in a race of a horse that tests positive for a drug substance in violation of Section 19581. Upon a finding of a prohibited drug substance in an official test sample, a horse may be summarily disqualified from the race in connection with which the drug sample was taken. Upon the disqualification of a horse pursuant to these regulations, any purse, prize, award, or record for that race shall be forfeited. However, the board, including its hearing officers and stewards, shall have the authority to order, in the interests of justice, that a jockey be permitted to keep his or her share of the purse, prize, or award for that race upon a finding that a person, other than the jockey, willfully, and with flagrant disregard for recommended veterinary practice and the regulations of the board, administered the prohibited substance. Such an order may provide that the jockey’s share of the purse, prize, or award shall be paid by the person or persons determined to be responsible for willfully administering the prohibited substance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 329, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19583.

Every veterinarian who treats a horse within the inclosure shall, in writing, on a form prescribed by the board, report to the official veterinarian in a manner prescribed by him or her, the name of the horse treated, the name of the trainer of the horse, the time of treatment, any medication administered to the horse, and any other information requested by the official veterinarian.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 881, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19583.5.

(a) Horses that are unsound or lame are subject to immediate placement on the Veterinarian’s List with criteria for removal that may include diagnostic imaging, examination of blood, and counsel with attending veterinarians.

(b) A horse placed on the Veterinarian’s List for being unsound or lame shall not workout for seven days after being placed on the list without the permission of the official veterinarian.

(c) The official veterinarian shall require any horse placed on the Veterinarian’s List to undergo a veterinary examination that may include diagnostic imaging before resuming training at any facility under the jurisdiction of the board.

(d) A horse placed on the Veterinarian’s List as unsound or lame shall be removed from the list only after having established or demonstrated to the satisfaction of the official veterinarian that the horse is then raceably sound and in fit physical condition to exert its best effort in a race.

(e) (1) A horse placed on the Veterinarian’s List as unsound or lame for the first time within a 365-day period shall stay on the Veterinarian’s List for a minimum of 15 days before the horse is eligible to be removed from the list.

(2) A horse placed on the Veterinarian’s List as unsound or lame for the second time in 365 days shall stay on the Veterinarian’s List for a minimum of 45 days before the horse is eligible to be removed from the list.

(3) A horse placed on the Veterinarian’s List as unsound or lame for the third time in 365 days shall stay on the Veterinarian’s List for a minimum of 75 days before the horse is eligible to be removed from the list.

(4) A horse placed on the Veterinarian’s List as unsound or lame for the fourth time in 365 days shall stay on the Veterinarian’s List for a minimum of 180 days before the horse is eligible to be removed from the list.

(f) The board may adopt rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this section.

(g) As used in this section, “workout” means an exercise session near full speed, or close to full speed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 251, Sec. 3.   (AB 1974)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19583.7.

In addition to any criteria set forth by a racing association, a thoroughbred or quarter horse that is four years of age or older that has not competed in a race or has previously raced but has not raced in the preceding 365 days shall not be allowed to race, unless the horse has passed an examination and a postwork official blood test or tests required by the official veterinarian or the equine medical director, administered by the official veterinarian or the equine medical director’s designee. The horse shall race within 30 days after meeting these requirements. A thoroughbred or quarter horse that has not raced within 120 days but has raced within 365 days shall have an examination performed by the official veterinarian or the equine medical director’s designee within 14 days before entry. Based upon that examination, the
 official veterinarian or the equine medical director’s designee may require the horse to work before being allowed to enter in a race. If the horse is required to work, it shall meet the same requirements as a horse that is working to be taken off the Official Veterinarian’s List, as specified in Section 19583.5 or any regulation adopted by the board pursuant to that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 251, Sec. 4.   (AB 1974)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19583.9.

(a) All horses at a licensed thoroughbred, fair, or quarter horse race meet shall be subject to veterinary monitoring during morning training. A licensed trainer and their staff shall be required to cooperate fully with all requests made by board-licensed veterinarians and outriders. All examining veterinarians at a race meet conducting live racing shall be under the direct supervision of the official veterinarian or the equine medical director.

(b) A trainer shall not administer, directly or indirectly, or otherwise permit to be administered, any medication to a horse under the trainer’s care that is racing or training at a board-approved racetrack, unless the medication is prescribed for that specific horse and administered strictly in
 accordance with board regulations.

(c) A trainer shall not apply to a horse’s feet on racing day any type of topical medication designed to alleviate pain, soreness, or tenderness of a horse’s feet.

(d) The use of diagnostic imaging shall be an accepted component of prerace examinations by an examining veterinarian. The official veterinarian may order the diagnostic imaging if they believe that the use is warranted. In addition, video footage may be used and maintained by the official veterinarian for the purpose of comparison when a horse is removed from the Veterinarian’s List.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 251, Sec. 5.   (AB 1974)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19583.10.

A racing association shall provide a location within the inclosure where a horse can be observed jogging in a circle in both directions by the official veterinarian or the equine medical director’s designee, if needed, as part of the prerace examination process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 251, Sec. 6.   (AB 1974)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19585.

The board shall establish and maintain a whistleblower program through which an owner, trainer, jockey, or stable-area employee may call designated persons under strict confidentiality to report questionable activity or concerns relating to the health and safety of humans or horses under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 251, Sec. 7.   (AB 1974)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Wagering [19590. - 19604.]

19590.

The board shall adopt rules governing, permitting, and regulating parimutuel wagering on horse races under the system known as the parimutuel method of wagering. Parimutuel wagering shall be conducted only by a person or persons licensed under this chapter to conduct a horse racing meeting or authorized by the board to conduct advance deposit wagering.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 505) by Stats. 2007, Ch. 613, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19591.

Any licensee conducting a horse racing meeting shall provide a place or places within the meeting grounds or inclosure where the licensee may conduct, operate, and supervise the parimutuel method of wagering in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 80.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19592.

The parimutuel system of wagering shall be operated only by a totalizator or other equipment approved by the board. The board shall not require any particular make of equipment. The communications system, technology, and method used to accept wagers and transmit odds, results, and other data related to wagering shall be approved by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 81.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19592.5.

In order to facilitate the intrastate transmission of racing programs, the board shall adopt regulations that provide for the compatibility of parimutuel totalizator systems within the state, including uniform procedures for the placing and cashing of parimutuel wagers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 82.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19593.

No method of betting, pool making, or wagering other than by the parimutuel method shall be permitted or used by any person licensed under this chapter to conduct a horse racing meeting.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19594.

Any person within the inclosure where a horse racing meeting is authorized may wager on the result of a horse race held at that meeting by contributing his money to the parimutuel pool operated by the licensee under this chapter. Such wagering is not unlawful, any other law of the State of California to the contrary notwithstanding.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19595.

Any form of wagering or betting on the result of a horse race other than that permitted by this chapter is illegal.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 198, Sec. 9) by Stats. 2007, Ch. 613, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19596.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may do any of the following:

(1) Authorize a licensed harness racing association that is conducting a live racing meeting in this state to accept wagers on the full card of races conducted by another racing association on the day that other association conducts the Breeders’ Crown Stakes, the Meadowlands Pace, the Hambletonian, the Cane Pace, the Kentucky Futurity, or the North American Cup.

(2) Authorize a licensed quarter horse racing association that is conducting a live racing meeting in this state to accept wagers on either of the following:

(A) Races conducted by the racing association that conducts the American Quarter Horse Racing Challenge, if the races are conducted on the same day as the American Quarter Horse Racing Challenge.

(B) The full card of races conducted by another racing association on the day that other association conducts the Texas Classic Futurity and Remington Park Futurity.

(3) Authorize the inclusion of wagers authorized pursuant to this section in the parimutuel pools of the out-of-state association that conducts the races on which the wagers are placed.

(b) The board authorization may be granted under this section only if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The authorization complies with federal
 laws, including, but not limited to, Chapter 57 (commencing with Section 3001) of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(2) Wagering is offered only within the racing enclosure and only within seven days of the running of the out-of-state race.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 225, Sec. 1.   (AB 897)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19596.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the board may authorize a harness or quarter horse association conducting a race meeting to accept wagers on the results of out-of-state or out-of-country harness or quarter horse races and, with the board’s approval and with the concurrence of the horsemen’s and horsewomen’s organization contracting with the association, other designated harness or quarter horse races during the period it is conducting the racing meeting, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The authorization complies with federal laws, including,
 but not limited to, Chapter 57 (commencing with Section 3001) of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(2) Wagering is offered only within the racing enclosure and only within 36 hours of the running of the out-of-state or out-of-country feature race.

(3) The association conducts at least seven live races, and imports not more than 10 races on those days during a racing meeting when live races are being run, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(4) If only one breed of horse specified in this section is being
 raced on a given day, then the association conducting the live racing may import those races that would otherwise be simulcast by the association that is not racing. After the usual deductions, including the portion for the racing association, the portion remaining for purses from these races shall be distributed equally for purses for harness and quarter horse
 horsemen and horsewomen.

(5) A quarter horse or harness racing association shall
 not accept wagers on out-of-state or out-of-country quarter horse or harness races commencing before 5:30 p.m., Pacific standard time, without the consent of any thoroughbred association or fair that is then conducting a live racing meeting in this state.

(b) An association that is authorized to import races pursuant to subdivision (a) may, at its sole discretion, import fewer than the maximum number of harness or quarter horse races authorized in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a). For up to two races per night, for each race that is not imported under the maximum authorized by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) on a particular night of racing, the association may add a race to the number of races allowable under the maximum authorization on another night of racing. However, no more than two races may be added under this subdivision to the number allowable on a single night, and the total number of imported
 races over a calendar year may not exceed the total number of imported races authorized pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (a).

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, wagering on a nightly program of out-of-country harness racing from a single racetrack, regardless of the number of those races, may be accepted if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) Only a harness racing association may import a nightly program of out-of-country harness racing from a single racetrack on days when a harness racing association is conducting live racing.

(2) On days when a harness racing association does not conduct live racing, a quarter horse association conducting live racing on that day may accept wagers on a nightly program of
 out-of-country harness racing from a single racetrack.

(3) A nightly program of out-of-country harness racing from a single racetrack may be imported in addition to the authorizations in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(4) (A) After the deductions required by this article and the rules of the board, the remaining funds from the total amount handled on out-of-country harness racing authorized pursuant to this subdivision shall be distributed equally to the racing associations conducting night meetings in that calendar year.

(B) Funds distributed to a harness racing association pursuant to this subdivision shall be distributed 50 percent as commissions and 50 percent as purses. Funds distributed to a quarter horse racing association pursuant to this subdivision shall be distributed as commissions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 100, Sec. 1.   (AB 2270)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19596.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law and except as provided in Section 19596.4, a thoroughbred racing association or fair may distribute the audiovisual signal and accept wagers on the results of out-of-state thoroughbred races conducted in the United States during the calendar period the association or fair is conducting a race meeting, including days on which there is no live racing being conducted by the association or fair, without the consent of the organization that represents horsemen and horsewomen participating in the race meeting and without regard to the amount of purses. Further, the total number of thoroughbred races imported by associations or fairs on a statewide basis under this section shall not exceed 75 per day on days when live thoroughbred or fair racing is being conducted in the state. The limitation of 75
 imported races per day does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Races imported for wagering purposes pursuant to subdivision (c).

(2) Races imported that are part of the race card of the Kentucky Derby, the Kentucky Oaks, the Preakness Stakes, the Belmont Stakes, the Jockey Club Gold Cup, the Travers Stakes, the Pegasus World Cup, the Arlington Million, the Breeders’ Cup World Championship, the Dubai World Cup, the Arkansas Derby, the Apple Blossom Handicap, the Blue Grass Stakes, the Whitney Stakes, or the Haskell Invitational.

(3) Races imported into the northern zone when there is no live thoroughbred or fair racing being conducted in the northern zone.

(4) Races imported into the combined central and southern zones when there is no live
 thoroughbred or fair racing being conducted in the combined central and southern zones.

(b) Any thoroughbred association or fair accepting wagers pursuant to subdivision (a) shall conduct the wagering in accordance with the applicable provisions of Sections 19601, 19616, 19616.1, and 19616.2.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), a thoroughbred association or fair shall not accept wagers pursuant to this section on out-of-state races commencing after 7 p.m., Pacific standard time, without the consent of the harness or quarter horse racing association that is then conducting a live racing meeting in the County of Orange or the County of Sacramento.

(d) When the total number of thoroughbred races imported by associations or fairs on a statewide basis under this section is between 51 and 75 on a day when live
 thoroughbred or fair racing is being conducted in the state, a thoroughbred association or fair shall not accept wagers pursuant to this section on out-of-state races commencing after 5 p.m., Pacific standard time, without the consent of the harness and quarter horse racing association that is then conducting a live racing meeting in the County of Orange or the County of Sacramento.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.3.   (AB 3261)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19596.21.

(a) In addition to the authorizations to accept wagers on out-of-state and out-of-country races pursuant to Sections 19596.2 and 19596.3 and in any other provision of law, during calendar periods when a thoroughbred association or another fair in the northern zone and the Humboldt County Fair simultaneously conduct live race meetings, the Humboldt County Fair and a thoroughbred association in the southern zone when conducting a live race meeting may accept wagers on days when live races are being run on the results of not more than eight out-of-state thoroughbred horse races, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The authorization complies with federal laws, including, but not limited to, Chapter 57 (commencing with Section 3001) of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(2) The Humboldt County Fair conducts at least six live races.

(3) The Humboldt County Fair and thoroughbred association in the southern zone shall accept these wagers only on out-of-state thoroughbred races that commence before 4:30 p.m., Pacific standard time.

(b) The Humboldt County Fair may contract with the thoroughbred association or fair in the southern zone to distribute the signal statewide on its behalf.

(c) Any thoroughbred association or fair accepting wagers pursuant to this section shall conduct the wagering in accordance with the applicable provisions of Sections 19601, 19616, 19616.1, and 19616.2, except that subdivision (i) of Section 19601 shall not be applicable for the purpose of fulfilling the authorization described in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Effective August 6, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

19596.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a thoroughbred racing association or fair may distribute the audiovisual signal and accept wagers on the results of out-of-country thoroughbred races during the calendar period the association or fair is conducting a race meeting, without the consent of the organization that represents horsemen participating in the race meeting. Out-of-country races shall be imported under the following conditions:

(a) A thoroughbred association or fair shall conduct the wagering in accordance with the applicable provisions of Sections 19601, 19616, 19616.1, and 19616.2.

(b) No thoroughbred association or fair
 may accept wagers pursuant to this section on out-of-country races commencing after 5:30 p.m., Pacific standard time, without the consent of the harness or quarter horse racing association that is then conducting a live racing meeting.

(c) A thoroughbred racing association or fair distributing the audiovisual signal and accepting wagers on the results of out-of-country races pursuant to this section may execute an agreement with an association that conducts thoroughbred races in the southern zone to allow that association to distribute the signal and accept wagers on the results of out-of-country thoroughbred races, except that the license fees paid to the state shall be double the amount paid by a quarter horse racing association specified in subdivision (b) of Section 19605.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 279, Sec. 1.   (SB 899)   Effective September 24, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

19596.4.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of, and subject to the conditions specified in subdivisions (c) and (d) of, Section 19596.2, if the total number of thoroughbred and fair racing days allocated by the board in the northern zone in any calendar year commencing with the calendar year 2001 is less than the total number of thoroughbred and fair racing days allocated by the board in calendar year 2000, a thoroughbred racing association or fair that has been allocated fewer racing days in the northern zone may distribute the audiovisual signal and accept wagers on the results of out-of-state and out-of-country thoroughbred races during the calendar period the association or fair is licensed to conduct a live race meeting, excluding Saturdays and Sundays.

(b) The total number of out-of-state and out-of-country thoroughbred races upon which wagers may be accepted pursuant to this section shall be sufficient to the extent reasonably possible to prevent any loss of revenue to the General Fund and the California racing participants, as determined by the executive director of the board but shall not exceed a maximum of three out-of-state or out-of-country thoroughbred races for every live race that has been eliminated by the board. A thoroughbred racing association in the northern zone shall not import these races on a day when a fair is conducting live racing in the northern zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 936, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19597.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a person licensed under this chapter to conduct a horse racing meeting shall, as to any payment made to a person who has wagered by contributing to a parimutuel pool operated by such licensee, also deduct the applicable breakage, as defined by Section 19405.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 83.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19597.5.

A person licensed under this chapter to conduct a horse racing meeting shall hold in trust the distributions required to be made pursuant to this chapter until the funds are paid to the various distributees. These required deductions, except for those that enure to the benefit of the racing association, are trust funds and shall not be used by the racing association for any purpose other than for payment to those distributees as directed by this chapter. These funds are not the property of the racing association, but are merely held in trust for the benefit of the statutory distributees until the funds are distributed to them in accordance with this chapter. These funds shall be held in a separate depository account until they are actually distributed as provided for in this
 chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   (AB 246)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

19598.

Any person claiming to be entitled to any part of a redistribution from a parimutuel pool operated by a licensee under this chapter, who fails to claim the money due the person prior to the completion of the horse racing meeting at which the pool was formed, may file a claim with the association issuing the person’s ticket prior to May 15 of the year immediately following the close of the horse racing meeting.

The funds that were unclaimed within the period specified under this section are designated as “unclaimed tickets” and shall be distributed in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19599.

An association or fair may offer any form of parimutuel wagering, as defined by regulations adopted by the board, or as defined by Chapter 4, Pari-Mutuel Wagering, Model Rules of Racing, as published by the Association of Racing Commissioners International. The board may prohibit any form of parimutuel wagering if it determines that the proposed wagering would compromise the honesty and integrity of racing in the state. Each racing association or fair shall include the types of conventional, exotic, and other wagering it proposes to offer on its application to conduct a horse racing meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 20.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

19601.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a licensed association or fair that is conducting a live meeting in any racing zone may accept wagers on any race conducted in this state, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The association or fair that conducts the racing meeting and the organization that is responsible for negotiating purse agreements on behalf of the horsemen participating in that racing meeting consent to the acceptance of the wagers. However, if consent is withheld, any party may appeal the withholding of consent to the board, which may determine that consent is not required.

(2) The association or fair conducts not less than eight races on days when the association or fair is licensed to conduct racing, except that fewer than eight live races per day may be conducted by the mutual agreement of the association or fair and the organization that is responsible for negotiating purse agreements on behalf of the horsemen participating in the racing meeting.

(3) Wagering is offered only within the association’s or fair’s racing inclosure or within the satellite wagering facility and only within seven days of the commencement of the racing program with the transmitted race.

(4) All wagers are included in the appropriate parimutuel pool at the racetrack of the association or fair where the race is conducted, or, in the appropriate parimutuel pool of the racetrack of the association or fair that accepts the transmitted race.

(5) The association or fair accepting wagers on an out-of-zone transmitted race distributes the audiovisual signal of the race to, and accepts wagers from, all eligible satellite wagering facilities.

(b) Any association or fair accepting wagers under subdivision (a) shall deduct, from the total amount handled in each conventional and exotic parimutuel pool on the transmitted race, the same percentages deducted pursuant to Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 19610) for races at its own meeting. However, if the wagers are from a quarter horse race meeting, then the amounts deducted shall be the same as for a quarter horse race meeting. Amounts deducted under this section, including amounts deducted from wagers on out-of-zone races within the inclosure of the association or fair, shall be distributed as provided under Sections 19605.7, 19605.72, and 19605.73 with respect to wagers made within the northern zone, or Sections 19605.71, 19605.72, and 19605.73 with respect to wagers made within the central or southern zone, except that amounts distributed for purposes other than state license fees and fees payable to the Center for Equine Health, School of Veterinary Medicine, University of California at Davis, and the California Animal Health and Food Safety Laboratory shall be proportionally reduced by the amount of any fees paid to the Triple Crown or Breeder’s Cup day host association pursuant to subdivision (c). The method used to calculate the reduction in proportionate share shall be approved by the board. For wagers on out-of-state and out-of-country races made within the association’s or fair’s inclosure, 1 percent shall be distributed to the association or fair as a satellite wagering facility commission.

(c) Nothing in this section precludes an association or fair from charging a fee as a condition of transmitting the Triple Crown or Breeder’s Cup day races, except that any fee shall be allocated among all associations, fairs, and satellite wagering facilities receiving the transmitted race in proportion to the amount wagered at each location, and the fee shall equal that charged by the entity conducting the race or races. Further, the only fee that can be charged as a condition of transmitting the signal of an out-of-zone race shall be a fee of 2.5 percent on Breeder’s Cup day races.

(d) All breakage and unclaimed tickets, including unclaimed refunds, shall be distributed equally between the association or fair that accepts wagers on the transmitted race, and the horsemen, in the form of purses. The purse moneys generated by this subdivision shall be made available for purses during the meeting in which they are received by the association or fair, or, if the association or fair is not then conducting a live racing meeting, during the next succeeding meeting of the association or fair.

(e) All wagers made pursuant to this section shall be considered to have been wagered at a satellite wagering facility and shall be excluded from total handle for the purposes of Section 19611.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 19530.5, satellite wagering facilities operated by a fair, in the Counties of Fresno, Kern, or Tulare shall be considered northern zone facilities and shall receive their audiovisual signal from the association or fair conducting a racing meeting in the northern zone that is authorized to distribute the signal and accept wagers on central and southern zone races. Satellite wagering facilities operated by a fair, in the Counties of Santa Barbara or Ventura shall be considered central-southern zone facilities and shall receive the audiovisual signal from the association or fair conducting a racing meeting in the central or southern zone that is authorized to distribute the signal and accept wagers on northern zone races.

(g) All purse moneys derived from wagering on out-of-zone races at fair racing meetings shall be distributed to all breeds of horses participating in the fair meeting in direct proportion to the purse money generated by breed on live races conducted during the fair race meeting.

(h) During calendar periods when both a fair and a thoroughbred association conduct live racing, the amounts deducted under this section shall be distributed on any day of overlap as provided in Section 19607.5, except that the applicable state license fee shall be at the rate specified for nonfair meetings in subdivision (b) of Section 19605.7.

(i) During calendar periods when a thoroughbred association and a fair, or a thoroughbred association and any other breed association are conducting a racing meeting in the same zone, the thoroughbred association shall be the association authorized to distribute out-of-zone, out-of-state, or out-of-country thoroughbred or fair races, except that the thoroughbred association may waive this right and allow the other breed racing association conducting a race meeting to distribute the signal and accept wagers on out-of-zone, out-of-state, or out-of-country thoroughbred or fair races for any racing day or days. For the purposes of this subdivision, the combined central and southern zone shall be considered one zone.

(j) In order to ensure, to the extent possible, that out-of-state and out-of-country simulcasting, furthers the purposes of this section, a committee made up of one representative from each of the then-operating thoroughbred associations or fairs that are conducting a live racing meeting in the state and one representative of the organization responsible for negotiating purse agreements on behalf of the horsemen participating in the meeting shall do the following:

(1) Determine the out-of-state or out-of-country thoroughbred races to be imported on a statewide basis pursuant to provisions of this chapter.

(2) Ensure, to the extent possible, that the fees charged by out-of-state or out-of-country entities for these signals are at the lowest obtainable rate and at the same rate statewide, in order to maximize the revenue available to in-state associations and fairs and their horsemen.

(3) Ensure, to the extent possible, due to the reciprocal nature of the interstate simulcasting business, that the maximum obtainable revenue is generated by the sale to out-of-state entities of the audiovisual signal of races conducted in this state by thoroughbred associations and fairs.

(4) Ensure that program information requirements for in-state signals comply with the standards of the board, but provide that abbreviated program formats may be used for races imported from other jurisdictions.

(k) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any thoroughbred association or fair, when operating a live racing meeting, shall distribute the signal of all races conducted by, or disseminated by, that association or fair to, and accept wagers on these races from, any association that is licensed to conduct a live quarter horse or harness racing meeting in Orange County and that conducted such a meeting in 1998.

(l) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all associations or fairs when operating as eligible satellite wagering facilities shall be in compliance with, and subject to the provisions of, Article 9.2 (commencing with Section 19605) of this chapter, and shall display the signal and accept wagers on all live races conducted in this state without regard to breed. Notwithstanding the foregoing provision, a thoroughbred racing association located in the City of Arcadia is exempt from these requirements for live harness and quarter horse races conducted at night unless the thoroughbred racing association facility is open for business at that time and is accepting wagers on other night signals pursuant to this chapter.

A quarter horse racing association located in the southern zone shall display the signal and accept wagers on all races imported by, or conducted by, a harness racing association conducting racing in the northern zone. A harness racing association in the northern zone shall display the signal and accept wagers on all races imported by, or conducted by, a quarter horse racing association conducting racing in the southern zone. On those nights when both the harness racing association in the northern zone and the quarter horse racing association in the southern zone are conducting live racing, the audiovisual signal of both breeds shall be displayed and wagers shall be accepted on both breeds at each of the locations where the live racing is being conducted, and each association shall display the audiovisual signal and accept wagers on the other association’s live or imported races throughout their respective facilities, as they do when they are conducting satellite wagering during other periods of the same day. Each association shall pay the other an additional 5 percent of the amount wagered at their respective facilities on the races imported by, or conducted by, the other racing association. The additional 5 percent received by the racing association pursuant to this paragraph shall be distributed as 50 percent as commissions to the racing association and 50 percent as purses to the horsemen participating in the racing meeting. Further, satellite wagering facilities located at fairs may, but are not required to, accept an audiovisual signal on out-of-state or out-of-country races unless the facility is open for business at the time and accepting wagers on other signals pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 72, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19601.01.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a thoroughbred association or fair, upon the filing of a written notice with, and approval by, the board specifying the percentage to be deducted, may deduct from the total amount handled in the parimutuel pool for any type of wager an amount of not less than 10 percent nor more than 25 percent. The written notice shall include the written agreement of the thoroughbred association or fair and the horsemen’s organization for the meeting of the thoroughbred association or fair accepting the wager. The established percentage to be deducted shall remain in effect until the filing of a subsequent notice with, and approval by, the board, unless otherwise specified in the notice. The amount deducted shall be distributed as prescribed in this
 chapter. However, any such distribution, except for amounts payable for the support of the board and the equine drug testing program pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19616.51, may be modified or redirected upon the filing with, and approval by, the board of a written notice that is authorized and signed by the organization representing each entity affected by the modification or redirection, including, but not limited to, horsemen’s organizations, racing associations, and fairs. If the proposed distribution modification or redirection increases or would increase the financial burden of any other organization or entity, the consent of that organization or entity shall also be obtained. This organization or entity consent provision for a distribution modification or redirection applies even if the percentage deduction is not increased pursuant to this subdivision.
